Utah statutes.
53B-18-602.   Program requirements -- Referrals -- Evaluation.

(1)  The program shall provide services to youth who have demonstrated behavioral and learning problems at school or have been referred to juvenile court for delinquent behavior.

(2)  Youths and their families in need of services may be identified and referred to the program through:

(a)  school officials;

(b)  juvenile court officers;

(c)  community social service agencies; or

(d)  parents.

(3)  The program shall actively seek and screen adult volunteers to work with high risk youth and their families.

(4)  The program shall provide training and support to the volunteers to prepare them for the wide variety of social, cultural, and other environmental factors they will encounter.

(5)  The volunteers shall:

(a)  enroll and involve youth in 4-H and other community service and activity programs;

(b)  provide academic tutoring, with an emphasis on reading skills, when necessary;

(c)  seek out opportunities for participation in structured recreational activities; and

(d)  facilitate the families' development of a positive family environment including:

(i)  setting clear expectations and limits in the home;

(ii)  fostering communication skills between family members;

(iii)  encouraging the families' involvement in the school and community; and

(iv)  assisting in the development of time management skills.

(6)  The program shall provide for an annual assessment and evaluation of the entire program including:

(a)  assessments conducted on youths and their families before entering the program;

(b)  documentation of ongoing changes observed in the youths while participating in the program, including behavioral and academic changes;

(c)  assessments conducted on youths and their families upon exiting the program; and

(d)  overall assessment of the program in the various communities, to include:

(i)  acceptance and support within the community;

(ii)  availability of sufficient programs and activities; and

(iii)  availability of qualified adults to serve as volunteers.



Enacted by Chapter 381, 1998 General Session

